cv_RU/cv_RU.aff
SFX H Y 283
SFX H 0 атӑп/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ӑватӑп/RS у
SFX H 0 тӑп/RS а
SFX H 0 мастӑп/RS .
SFX H 0 атӑн/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ӑватӑн/RS у
SFX H 0 тӑн/RS а
SFX H 0 мастӑн/RS .
SFX H 0 ать [^уай]
SFX H у ӑвать у
SFX H 0 ть а
SFX H й ять й
SFX H 0 масть .
SFX H 0 атпӑр/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ӑватпӑр/RS у
SFX H 0 тпӑр/RS а
SFX H 0 мастпӑр/RS .
SFX H 0 атӑр/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ӑватӑр/RS у
SFX H 0 тӑр/RS а
SFX H 0 мастӑр/RS .
SFX H 0 аҫҫӗ/T [^уа]
SFX H у ӑваҫҫӗ/T у
SFX H 0 ҫҫӗ/T а
SFX H 0 маҫҫӗ/T .
SFX H 0 аятӑп/RS [^уай]
SFX H й яятӑп/RS й
SFX H у ӑваятӑп у
SFX H 0 ятӑп/RS а
SFX H 0 аймастӑп/RS [^ауй]
SFX H у ӑваймастӑп/RS у
SFX H 0 ймастӑп/RS а
SFX H й яймастӑп/RS й
SFX H 0 аятӑн/RS [^уай]
SFX H у ӑваятӑн/RS у
SFX H й яятӑн/RS й
SFX H 0 ятӑн/RS а
SFX H 0 аймастӑн/RS [^ауй]
SFX H у ӑваймастӑн/RS у
SFX H 0 ймастӑн/RS а
SFX H й яймастӑп/RS а
SFX H 0 аять [^уай]
SFX H у ӑваять у
SFX H й яять й
SFX H 0 ять а
SFX H 0 аймасть [^ауй]
SFX H у ӑваймасть у
SFX H 0 ймасть а
SFX H й яймасть й
SFX H 0 аятпӑр/RS [^уай]
SFX H у ӑваятпӑр/RS у
SFX H 0 ятпӑр/RS а
SFX H й яятпӑр/RS й
SFX H 0 аймастпӑр/RS [^ауй]
SFX H у ӑваймастпӑр/RS у
SFX H 0 ймастпӑр/RS а
SFX H й яймастпӑр/RS й
SFX H 0 аятӑр/RS [^уай]
SFX H у ӑваятӑр/RS у
SFX H 0 ятӑр/RS а
SFX H й яятӑр/RS й
SFX H 0 аймастӑр/RS [^ауй]
SFX H у ӑваймастӑр/RS у
SFX H 0 ймастӑр/RS а
SFX H й яймастӑр/RS й
SFX H 0 аяҫҫӗ/T [^уай]
SFX H у ӑваяҫҫӗ/T у
SFX H 0 яҫҫӗ/T а
SFX H й яяҫҫӗ/T й
SFX H 0 аймаҫҫӗ/T [^ауй]
SFX H у ӑваймаҫҫӗ/T у
SFX H 0 ймаҫҫӗ/T а
SFX H й яймаҫҫӗ/T й
SFX H 0 ӑп/RS [^ау]
SFX H а ӑп/RS а
SFX H у ӑвӑп/RS у
SFX H 0 мӑп/RS .
SFX H 0 ӑн/RS [^ау]
SFX H а ӑн/RS а
SFX H у ӑвӑн/RS у
SFX H 0 мӑн/RS .
SFX H 0 аймӑн/RS [^ауй]
SFX H 0 ймӑн/RS а
SFX H й ямӑн/RS й
SFX H у ӑваймӑн/RS у
SFX H 0 ӗ/R [^ау]
SFX H а ӗ/R а
SFX H у ӑвӗ/R у
SFX H 0 мӗ/R .
SFX H 0 ӑпӑр/RS [^ау]
SFX H а ӑпӑр/RS а
SFX H у ӑвӑпӑр/RS у
SFX H 0 мӑпӑр/RS .
SFX H 0 ӑр/RS [^ау]
SFX H а ӑр/RS а
SFX H у ӑвӑр/RS у
SFX H 0 мӑр/RS .
SFX H 0 ӗҫ/T [^ау]
SFX H а ӗҫ/T а
SFX H у ӑвӗҫ/T у
SFX H 0 мӗҫ/T .
SFX H 0 рӑм/RS [^лрн]
SFX H 0 тӑм/RS [лрн]
SFX H 0 марӑм/RS .
SFX H 0 рӑн/RS [^лрн]
SFX H 0 тӑн/RS [лрн]
SFX H 0 марӑн/RS .
SFX H 0 рӗ/RT [^лрн]
SFX H 0 чӗ/T [лрн]
SFX H 0 марӗ/RT .
SFX H 0 рӑмӑр/RS [^лрн]
SFX H 0 тӑмӑр/RS [лрн]
SFX H 0 марӑмӑр/RS .
SFX H 0 рӑр/RS [^лрн]
SFX H 0 тӑр/RS [лрн]
SFX H 0 марӑр/RS .
SFX H 0 рӗҫ/T [^лрн]
SFX H 0 чӗҫ/T [лрн]
SFX H 0 марӗҫ/T .
SFX H 0 аттӑм/RS [^айу]
SFX H 0 ттӑм/RS а
SFX H у ӑваттӑм/RS у
SFX H й яттӑм/RS й
SFX H 0 мастӑм/RS .
SFX H 0 аттӑн/RS [^айу]
SFX H 0 ттӑн/RS а
SFX H у ӑваттӑн/RS у
SFX H й яттӑн/RS й
SFX H 0 мастӑн/RS .
SFX H 0 атчӗ/T [^айу]
SFX H 0 тчӗ/T а
SFX H у ӑватчӗ/T у
SFX H й ятчӗ/T й
SFX H 0 мастчӗ/T .
SFX H 0 аттӑмӑр/RS [^айу]
SFX H 0 ттӑмӑр/RS а
SFX H у ӑваттӑмӑр/RS у
SFX H й яттӑмӑр/RS й
SFX H 0 мастӑмӑр/RS .
SFX H 0 аттӑр/RS [^айу]
SFX H 0 ттӑр/RS а
SFX H у ӑваттӑр/RS у
SFX H й яттӑр/RS й
SFX H 0 мастӑр/RS .
SFX H 0 атчӗҫ/T [^айу]
SFX H 0 тчӗҫ/T а
SFX H у ӑватчӗҫ/T у
SFX H й ятчӗ/T й
SFX H 0 мастчӗҫ/T .
SFX H 0 саттӑм/RS .
SFX H 0 саттӑн/R .
SFX H 0 саччӗ .
SFX H 0 саттӑмӑр/R .
SFX H 0 саттӑр/R .
SFX H 0 саччӗҫ/T .
SFX H 0 ӑттӑм/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ӑвӑттӑм/RS у
SFX H а ӑттӑм/RS а
SFX H 0 мӑттӑм/RS .
SFX H 0 ӑттӑн/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ӑвӑттӑн/RS у
SFX H а ӑттӑн/RS а
SFX H 0 мӑттӑн/RS .
SFX H 0 ӗччӗ/T [^уа]
SFX H у ӑвӗччӗ/T у
SFX H а ӗччӗ/T а
SFX H 0 мӗччӗ/T .
SFX H 0 ӑттӑмӑр/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ӑвӑттӑмӑр/RS у
SFX H а ӑттӑмӑр/RS а
SFX H 0 мӑттӑмӑр/RS .
SFX H 0 ӑттӑр/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ӑвӑттӑр/RS у
SFX H а ӑттӑр/RS а
SFX H 0 мӑттӑр/RS .
SFX H 0 ӗччӗҫ/T [^уа]
SFX H у ӑвӗччӗҫ/T у
SFX H а ӗччӗҫ/T а
SFX H 0 мӗччӗҫ/T .
SFX H 0 ӑпин [^уа]
SFX H у ӑвӑпин у
SFX H а ӑпин а
SFX H 0 мӑпин .
SFX H 0 ӑсӑн [^уа]
SFX H у ӑвӑсӑн у
SFX H а ӑсӑн а
SFX H 0 мӑсӑн .
SFX H 0 ин/R [^уа]
SFX H у ӑвин/R у
SFX H а ин/R а
SFX H 0 мин .
SFX H 0 ӑпӑрин [^уа]
SFX H у ӑвӑпӑрин у
SFX H а ӑпӑрин а
SFX H 0 мӑпӑрин .
SFX H 0 ӑсӑр [^уа]
SFX H у ӑвӑсӑр у
SFX H а ӑсӑр а
SFX H 0 мӑсӑр .
SFX H 0 ӗҫин [^уа]
SFX H у ӑвӗҫин у
SFX H а ӗҫин а
SFX H 0 мӗҫин .
SFX H 0 ам/RS [^уая]
SFX H у ӑвам/RS у
SFX H 0 м/RS а
SFX H й ям/RS й
SFX H 0 тӑр/RS .
SFX H 0 ар [^уа]
SFX H у ӑвар у
SFX H 0 р а
SFX H й яр й
SFX H 0 ӑр/S [^уа]
SFX H у ӑвӑр/S у
SFX H а ӑр/S а
SFX H 0 ччӑр/S .
SFX H 0 ма/S .
SFX H 0 масӑр/S .
SFX H 0 машкӑн/S .
SFX H 0 малли/AT .
SFX H 0 маллисем/P .
SFX H 0 акан/AS [^ауй]
SFX H 0 акансем/P [^ауй]
SFX H 0 кан/AS а
SFX H 0 кансем/P а
SFX H у ӑвакан/AS у
SFX H у ӑвакансем/P у
SFX H й якан/AS й
SFX H й якансем/P й
SFX H 0 ни/BRT .
SFX H 0 нисем/P .
SFX H 0 ман/RS .
SFX H 0 маншӑн/S .
SFX H 0 айман/RS [^ауй]
SFX H 0 йман/RS а
SFX H й яйман/RS й
SFX H у ӑвайман/RS у
SFX H 0 айманшӑн/S [^ауй]
SFX H 0 йманшӑн/S а
SFX H й яйманшӑн/S й
SFX H у ӑвайманшӑн/S у
SFX H 0 манни/BTR .
SFX H 0 маннисем/P .
SFX H 0 асси/BRT [^ауй]
SFX H 0 ассисем/P [^ауй]
SFX H 0 сси/BRT а
SFX H 0 ссисем/P а
SFX H у ӑвасси/BRT у
SFX H у ӑвассисем/P у
SFX H й ясси/BRT й
SFX H й яссисем/P й
SFX H 0 ас/TR [^ауй]
SFX H 0 с/RS а
SFX H у ӑвас/RS у
SFX H 0 асла [^ауй]
SFX H 0 сла а
SFX H у ӑвасла у
SFX H 0 асшӑн/RS [^ауй]
SFX H 0 сшӑн/RS а
SFX H у ӑвасшӑн/RS у
SFX H й яс/RS й
SFX H 0 нӑ/RS .
SFX H 0 нӑшӑн/S .
SFX H 0 нӑран/S .
SFX H 0 малла/RS .
SFX H 0 ан/RS [^ауй]
SFX H 0 н/RS а
SFX H у ӑван/RS у
SFX H й ян/RS й
SFX H 0 са/RS .
SFX H 0 сан/S .
SFX H 0 масан/S .
SFX H 0 сассӑн/S .
SFX H 0 масассӑн/S .
SFX H 0 а [^ауй]
SFX H у ӑва у
SFX H й я й
SFX H 0 иччен/T [^ау]
SFX H а иччен/T а
SFX H у ӑвиччен/T у
SFX H 0 миччен/T .
SFX H 0 массерен/T .
SFX H 0 нӑҫемӗн/T .

SFX I Y 55
SFX I а и а
SFX I а ин а
SFX I а ине а
SFX I а инче а
SFX I а ипе а
SFX I а исӗр а
SFX I а исем/P а
SFX I а ишӗн а
SFX I 0 х а
SFX I а ӑсем/P а
SFX I а ӑн а
SFX I а ӑна а
SFX I а ӑра а
SFX I а ӑран а
SFX I а ӑпа а
SFX I а ӑпалан а
SFX I а ӑсӑр а
SFX I а ӑшӑн а
SFX I а ӑри а
SFX I о и о
SFX I о ин о
SFX I о ине о
SFX I о инче о
SFX I о ипе о
SFX I о исӗр о
SFX I о исем/P о
SFX I о ишӗн о
SFX I о ӑсем/P о
SFX I о ӑн о
SFX I о ӑна о
SFX I о ӑра о
SFX I о ӑран о
SFX I о ӑпа о
SFX I о ӑпалан о
SFX I о ӑсӑр о
SFX I о ӑшӑн о
SFX I о ӑри о
SFX I я и я 
SFX I я ин я
SFX I я ине я
SFX I я инче я
SFX I я ипе я
SFX I я исӗр я
SFX I я исем/P я
SFX I я ишӗн я
SFX I я ьӑсем/P я
SFX I я ьӑн я
SFX I я ьӑна я
SFX I я ьӑра я
SFX I я ьӑран я
SFX I я ьӑпа я
SFX I я ьӑпалан я
SFX I я ьӑсӑр я
SFX I я ьӑшӑн я
SFX I я ьӑри я

SFX J N 6
SFX J 0 ах [^а]
SFX J 0 х а
SFX J 0 рах .
SFX J 0 рахчӗ .
SFX J 0 тарах .
SFX J 0 тарахчӗ .

SFX K Y 14
SFX K 0 са .
SFX K 0 сах .
SFX K 0 сан .
SFX K 0 а [^ау]
SFX K у ӑва у
SFX K 0 иччен [^ау]
SFX K а иччен а
SFX K у ӑвиччен у
SFX K 0 массерен .
SFX K 0 нӑҫем .
SFX K 0 нӑҫемӗн .
SFX K у ӑвуҫӑн у
SFX K 0 уҫӑн [^ау]
SFX K а уҫӑн а

SFX L Y 16
SFX L 0 се .
SFX L 0 сех .
SFX L 0 сен .
SFX L 0 е [^еӳ]
SFX L ӳ ӗве ӳ
SFX L 0 иччен [^еӳи]
SFX L е иччен е
SFX L и йиччен и
SFX L ӳ ӑвиччен ӳ
SFX L 0 мессерен .
SFX L 0 нӗҫем .
SFX L 0 нӗҫемӗн .
SFX L ӳ ӗвӳҫӗн е
SFX L 0 ӳҫӗн [^еӳи]
SFX L е ӳҫӗн е
SFX L и йӳҫӗн и

SFX M N 33
SFX M е и е
SFX M е ине е
SFX M е исене е
SFX M е инче е
SFX M е исенче е
SFX M е ипе е
SFX M е исемпе е
SFX M е исӗр е
SFX M е исемсӗр е
SFX M е исем е
SFX M е ишӗн е
SFX M е исемшӗн е
SFX M 0 х е
SFX M е ӗсем е
SFX M е ӗсемех е
SFX M е ӗн е
SFX M е ӗсен е
SFX M е ӗне е
SFX M е ӗсене е
SFX M е ӗре е
SFX M е ӗсенче е
SFX M е ӗрен е
SFX M е ӗсенчен е
SFX M е ӗпе е
SFX M е ӗсемпе е
SFX M е ӗпелен е
SFX M е ӗсемпелен е
SFX M е ӗсӗр е
SFX M е ӗсемсӗр е
SFX M е ӗшӗн е
SFX M е ӗсемшӗн е
SFX M е ӗри е
SFX M е ӗсенчи е

SFX N Y 24
SFX N сть ҫӑн сть
SFX N сь ҫӑн ись
SFX N зь ҫӑн зь
SFX N сть ҫсем/P сть
SFX N сь ҫсем/P ись
SFX N зь ҫсем/P зь
SFX N сть ҫа сть
SFX N сь ҫа ись
SFX N зь ҫа зь
SFX N сть ҫра сть
SFX N сь ҫра ись
SFX N зь ҫра зь
SFX N сть ҫран сть
SFX N сь ҫран ись
SFX N зь ҫран зь
SFX N сть ҫпа сть
SFX N сь ҫпа ись
SFX N зь ҫпа зь
SFX N сть ҫсӑр сть
SFX N сь ҫсӑр ись
SFX N зь ҫсӑр зь
SFX N сть ҫшӑн сть
SFX N сь ҫшӑн ись
SFX N зь ҫшӑн зь
