cv_RU/cv_RU.dic
ҫӗнтер/GL
ҫыр/H
ӑнлан/H
ӑнсӑртран/J
ӑссӑн/J
ӑсчахлан/H
ӑшӑлла/J
Аксинья/I
Алёна/I
Анжелика/I
Аполлоновна/I
Атлантика/I
Бирюса/I
Валентиновна/I
Василиса/I
Вильянуэва/I
Воробьева/I
Гватемала/I
Гранада/I
Двина/I
Евгения/I
Женева/I
Илларионовна/I
Итака/I
Караганда/I
Клара/I
Кристина/I
Лиговка/I
Люба/I
Мальвина/I
Матильда/I
Молоткина/I
Невада/I
Олеговна/I
Пасадина/I
Прибалтика/I
Саламанка/I
Семёновна/I
Спика/I
Тарасовна/I
Тулуза/I
Феликсовна/I
Чита/I
Элла/I
Юта/I
абхазла/J
авӑнчӑклат/H
авансцена/I
аврӑнтар/H
автоматика/I
авторла/HJ
агитбригада/I
азбукӑлла/HJ
айӑккӑн/J
айваннӑн/J
айлӑмлан/H
аккредитла/HJ
албанла/J
алгебра/I
алтӑн/H
алхасуллӑн/J
амальгамӑла/HJ
анекдотла/HJ
анисовка/I
аннексионистла/H
антонимла/HJ
апатлан/H
арабистика/I
арабла/HJ
арккан/H
архитектоника/I
асӑрхануллӑн/J
асаплӑн/J
аскӑнлат/H
атлетла/HJ
аффриката/I
ахӑрт/H
ачашшӑн/J
бадминтонла/J
банда/I
батракла/HJ
беллетристика/I
бензохранилище/M
блуза/I
бойкотла/H
боксла/HJ
бомбоубежище/M
бригантина/I
бура/I
буржуйла/J
вӑйсӑррӑн/J
вӑлтлаттар/H
вӑраххӑн/J
вӑркаттар/H
вӑтанчӑклӑн/J
вӑштӑртаттар/H
валеҫ/L
валторна/I
варкӑн/H
васкаваррӑн/J
вашӑккӑн/J
вашкӑнтар/H
ведомость/N
верстка/I
винаватлӑн/J
витрина/I
власть/N
водохранилище/M
вулетка/I
вульгаризаторла/HJ
выҫтар/H
выльӑхла/J
газохранилище/M
гардина/I
гидротехника/I
гондола/I
гранитла/H
графиня/I
дека/I
демократла/J
дидактура/I
драга/I
ерт/L
жалоба/I
живопись/N
закуска/I
землечерпалка/I
зернохранилище/M
идиома/I
идиотла/J
известь/N
инженерла/HJ
искусство/I
истерикӑлла/J
июклаттар/H
йӑлкӑштар/H
йӑнлаттар/H
йӑрӑмӑн/J
йӑранла/H
йӑшӑкла/H
йышӑнтар/H
кӑвакарчӑнла/J
кӑкарӑнтар/H
кӑн/AH
кӑпкалантар/H
кӑркӑсла/J
кӑсӑклантар/H
кӑчӑркалан/H
каҫӑрӑлтар/H
казакла/J
какайлан/H
каламянка/I
камсӑртаттар/H
канӑҫсӑррӑн/J
капарлан/H
капелла/I
каппӑн/J
каркаррӑн/J
карлӑклан/H
картотека/I
каршлат/H
катапульта/I
катлаттар/H
катмаррӑн/J
каштӑрт/H
кзпмаррӑн/J
кинетика/I
кинопромышленность/N
кирза/I
клиентура/I
кокарда/I
колея/N
командировка/I
коммунистла/J
корректура/I
крахмалла/H
крепость/N
куккукла/HJ
куклат/H
кума/I
курӑклан/H
куракла/J
кушакла/HJ
лӑймакала/H
лӑпӑртат/H
лӑслан/H
лакӑштат/H
лапӑрккалан/H
лаптӑкӑн/J
лаптаклат/H
латӑртаттар/H
лезгинла/J
лесоводство/I
летопись/N
лимитла/H
люлька/I
мӑкӑртат/H
мӑкшӑлла/J
мӑтӑкла/H
мӑшӑрла/HJ
мазутла/H
макӑрмалла/J
марихуана/I
мартышкӑлла/HJ
маскировкӑла/H
медуза/I
медучилище/M
механикӑлла/HJ
мода/I
моноплан/H
муккалла/J
нӑйкӑштар/H
нагрузка/I
намӑссӑрла/HJ
нефтехранилище/M
новаторла/HJ
нравственность/N
нумайлат/H
область/N
оборона/I
общественность/N
овощехранилище/M
пӑлхавлӑн/J
пӑлхат/H
пӑрула/H
пӑчӑла/H
пӑштӑн/J
пагода/I
пайӑрт/H
панклаттар/H
патваррӑн/J
патраклан/H
педагогика/I
педучилище/M
пессимистла/J
пихта/I
повесть/N
политика/I
примерла/H
приставка/I
промышленность/N
профтехучилище/M
птичница/I
пук/H
пусӑх/H
пушӑлла/J
пылаклат/H
рапира/I
раскольникла/J
резинӑла/H
риторика/I
румынла/HJ
руна/I
сӑмахла/H
сӑнсӑр/J
сӑрӑхтар/H
саботажникла/J
савӑллан/H
савӑнӑҫсӑр/J
салхусӑр/J
самайлантар/H
сарӑмсӑр/J
сардина/I
саркала/H
семафорла/HJ
сетка/I
силосохранилище/M
сионизмла/HJ
скупщина/I
славянла/J
совесть/N
сотня/I
специальность/N
статистика/I
стилизаторла/JG
стрельбище/M
сукмакла/H
сунаслаттар/H
суслаш/H
сушилка/I
сыввӑн/J
сыпӑнтар/H
тӑванлаш/H
тӑваттӑлла/J
тӑкаклан/H
тӑнӑҫлан/H
тӑпкалан/H
тӑрӑххӑн/J
тӑрмаклан/H
тӑшманла/HJ
такка/H
тар/AHK
тарӑхлӑн/J
телеателье/M
телепередача/I
тематикӑлла/J
тинкер/L
тир/GLB
трахея/I
триерла/H
туллин/J
турамла/H
тутӑх/AHK
тухӑҫлӑн/J
тыллаттар/H
узурпаторла/HJ
улӑпла/J
улаш/H
ункӑла/HJ
уравниловка/I
урлӑн/J
утна/J
утюглан/H
фаталистла/HJ
ферзь/N
фигура/I
фильтрла/HJ
фотокамера/I
футболла/HJ
хӑвалаттар/H
хӑнтӑрла/H
хӑравҫӑллӑн/J
хӑчлаттар/H
хӑяккӑн/J
халтӑртат/H
халтурӑлла/J
харсӑррӑн/J
хранилище/M
хуҫкалан/H
художница/I
хуйхӑллӑн/J
хурчкалла/J
хусӑклаттар/H
цитатӑла/H
цыганла/HJ
чӑрмавла/H
чалӑшла/J
чалӑшлан/H
чашлаттар/H
чуххӑм/J
шӑйлат/H
шӑпчӑкла/HJ
шӑраҫлан/H
шайлӑн/J
шалпарлан/H
шарлатанла/HJ
шинӑла/H
ширма/I
шпионла/HJ
шурӑлла/J
шыҫӑн/H
ыйхӑллӑн/J
ытамлӑн/J
экзотика/I
экипировкӑла/H
эксплуататорла/HJ
эстетла/HJ
этика/I
юпалла/J
юсан/H
янла/H
янташла/J
